North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-32.1 Uniform Limited Liability Company Act
10-32.1-32.
Liability for improper distributions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if a member of a member-managed limited liability company, manager of a manager-managed limited liability company, or governor of a board-managed limited liability company consents to a distribution made in violation of section 10-32.1-31 and in consenting to the distribution fails to comply with section 10-32.1-41, then the member, manager, or governor is personally liable to the company for the amount of the distribution that exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without the violation of section 10-32.1-31.

To the extent the operating agreement of a member-managed limited liability company expressly relieves a member of the authority and responsibility to consent to distributions and imposes that authority and responsibility on one or more other members, the liability stated in subsection 1 applies to the other members and not the member that the operating agreement relieves of authority and responsibility.

A person that receives a distribution knowing that the distribution to that person was made in violation of section 10-32.1-31 is personally liable to the limited liability company but only to the extent that the distribution received by the person exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid under section 10-32.1-31.

A person against which an action is commenced because the person is liable under subsection 1 may:

Implead any other person that is subject to liability under subsection 1 and seek to compel pro rata contribution from the person in that action to the extent of the liability of the person as provided in subsection 1; and

Implead any person that received a distribution in violation of section 10-32.1-31 and seek to compel contribution from the person in the amount by which the distribution received by the person exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid under section 10-32.1-31.

An action under this section is barred if not commenced within two years after the distribution.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-33.
Direct action by a member.

Subject to subsection 2, a member may maintain a direct action against another member, a manager, a governor, or the limited liability company to enforce the rights of the member and otherwise protect the interests of the member, including rights and interests under the operating agreement or this chapter or arising independently of the membership relationship.

A member maintaining a direct action under this section must plead and prove an actual or threatened injury that is not solely the result of an injury suffered or threatened to be suffered by the limited liability company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-34.
Derivative action.

A member may maintain a derivative action to enforce a right of a limited liability company if:

The member first makes a demand on the other members in a member-managed or board-managed limited liability company, the managers of a manager-managed limited liability company, or the board of governors of a board-managed limited liability company requesting that they cause the company to bring an action to enforce the right, and the member, manager, or board does not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

A demand under subsection 1 would be futile.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-35.
Proper plaintiff.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a derivative action under section 10-32.1-34 may be maintained only by a person that is a member at the time the action is commenced and remains a member while the action continues.

If the sole plaintiff in a derivative action dies while the action is pending, then the court may permit another member of the limited liability company to be substituted as plaintiff.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-36.
Pleading.

In a derivative action under section 10-32.1-34, the complaint must state with particularity:

The date and content of the demand of the plaintiff and the response to the demand by the other members, managers, or board of governors; or

If a demand has not been made, the reasons a demand under subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-34, would be futile.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-37.
Special litigation committee.

If a limited liability company is named as or made a party in a derivative proceeding, then the company may appoint a special litigation committee to investigate the claims asserted in the proceeding and determine whether pursuing the action is in the best interests of the company. If the company appoints a special litigation committee, then on motion by the committee made in the name of the company, except for good cause shown, the court shall stay discovery for the time reasonably necessary to permit the committee to make its investigation. This subsection does not prevent the court from enforcing the right of a person to information under section 10-32.1-42 or, for good cause shown, granting extraordinary relief in the form of a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction.

A special litigation committee may be composed of one or more disinterested and independent individuals, who may be members.

A special litigation committee may be appointed:

In a member-managed limited liability company:

By the consent of a majority of the members not named as defendants or plaintiffs in the proceeding; and

If all members are named as defendants or plaintiffs in the proceeding, then by a majority of the members named as defendants;

In a manager-managed limited liability company:

By a majority of the managers not named as defendants or plaintiffs in the proceeding; and

If all managers are named as defendants or plaintiffs in the proceeding, then by a majority of the managers named as defendants; and

In a board-managed limited liability company:

By a majority of governors not named as defendants or plaintiffs in the proceeding; and

If all governors are named as defendants or plaintiffs in the proceeding, then by a majority of the governors named as defendants.

After appropriate investigation, a special litigation committee may determine that it is in the best interests of the limited liability company that the proceeding:

Continue under the control of the plaintiff;

Continue under the control of the committee;

Be settled on terms approved by the committee; or

Be dismissed.

After making a determination under subsection 4, a special litigation committee shall file with the court a statement of its determination and its report supporting its determination, giving notice to the plaintiff. The court shall determine whether the members of the committee were disinterested and independent and whether the committee conducted its investigation and made its recommendation in good faith, independently, and with reasonable care, with the committee having the burden of proof. If the court finds that the members of the committee were disinterested and independent and that the committee acted in good faith, independently, and with reasonable care, then the court shall enforce the determination of the committee. Otherwise, the court shall dissolve the stay of discovery entered under subsection 1 and allow the action to proceed under the direction of the plaintiff.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-38.
Proceeds and expenses.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:

Any proceeds or other benefits of a derivative action under section 10-32.1-34, whether by judgment, compromise, or settlement, belong to the limited liability company and not to the plaintiff; and

If the plaintiff receives any proceeds, then the plaintiff shall remit them immediately to the company.

If a derivative action under section 10-32.1-34 is successful in whole or in part, then the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney fees and costs, from the recovery of the limited liability company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-39.
Management of a limited liability company.

A limited liability company is a member-managed limited liability company unless the operating agreement:

Expressly provides that:

The company is or will be “manager-managed” or “board-managed”;

The company is or will be “managed by managers” or “managed by a board”; or

Management of the company is or will be “vested in managers” or “vested in a board”; or

Includes words of similar import.

Except as provided in subdivision b, in a member-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

The management and conduct of the company are vested in the members.

Each member has equal rights in the management and conduct of the activities of the company.

A difference arising among members as to a matter in the ordinary course of the activities of the company may be decided by a majority of the members.

An act outside the ordinary course of the activities of the company may be undertaken only with the consent of all members, except member consent is not required for the grant of a lien on or security interest in all or substantially all of the company’s property and assets, whether in the usual and regular course of the company’s business, or for the transfer of any or all of the company’s property to an organization, all of the ownership interests that are directly or indirectly owned through wholly owned organizations, by the company.

The operating agreement may be amended only with the consent of all members.

Notwithstanding subdivision a, in a member-managed limited liability company created after July 31, 2017, the following rules apply:

The management and conduct of the company are vested in the members.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or in an operating agreement, each member possesses voting power in the management and conduct of the activities of the company in proportion to the interest of the member in distributions of the limited liability company before dissolution and winding up.

A difference arising among members as to a matter in the ordinary course of the activities of the company may be decided by a majority of the voting power of the transferable interest of the members.

An act outside the ordinary course of the activities of the company may be undertaken only with the consent of all members.

The operating agreement may be amended only with the consent of all members.

In a manager-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, any matter relating to the activities of the company is decided exclusively by the managers.

Each manager has equal rights in the management and conduct of the activities of the company.

A difference arising among managers as to a matter in the ordinary course of the activities of the company may be decided by a majority of the managers.

The consent of all members is required to:

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the property of the company, with or without the good will, outside the ordinary course of the activities of the company, except member consent is not required for the grant of a lien on or security interest in all or substantially all of the company’s property and assets, whether in the usual and regular course of the company’s business, or for the transfer of any or all of the company’s property to an organization, all of the ownership interests that are directly or indirectly owned through wholly owned organizations, by the company;

Approve a merger, conversion, or domestication under sections 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-71;

Undertake any other act outside the ordinary course of the activities of the company; or

Amend the operating agreement.

A manager may be chosen at any time by the consent of a majority of the members and remains a manager until a successor has been chosen, unless the manager at an earlier time resigns, is removed, or dies, or, in the case of a manager that is not an individual, terminates. A manager may be removed at any time by the consent of a majority of the members without notice or cause.

A person need not be a member to be a manager, but the dissociation of a member that is also a manager removes the person as a manager. If a person that is both a manager and a member ceases to be a manager, that cessation does not by itself dissociate the person as a member.

The ceasing of a person to be a manager does not discharge any debt, obligation, or other liability to the limited liability company or members which the person incurred while a manager.

In a board-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

The activities and affairs of a limited liability company are to be managed by and under the direction of a board of governors, which shall consist of one or more governors as determined by members holding a majority of the voting power of the members. Except as specifically stated in this subsection and in subsection 11 of section 10-32.1-21 and subject to section 10-32.1-24:

The board acts only through an act of the board;

No individual governor has any right or power to act for the limited liability company; and

Only officers, managers, or other agents designated by the board or through a process approved by the board have the right to act for the limited liability company, and that right extends only to the extent consistent with the terms of the designation.

A governor must be an individual. An individual need not be a member to be a governor, but the dissociation of a member who is an individual and who also a governor disqualifies the individual as a governor. If an individual who is both a governor and a member ceases to be a governor, that cessation does not by itself dissociate the individual as a member. The ceasing of an individual to be a governor does not discharge any debt, obligation, or other liability to the limited liability company or members which the individual incurred while a governor.

The method of election and any additional qualifications for governors will be as determined by members holding a majority of the voting power of the members. Governors are elected by a plurality of the voting power present and entitled to vote on the election of governors at a duly called or held meeting at which a quorum is present.

A member may waive notice of a meeting for the election of governors. The waiver of notice by a member under this subdivision is effective whether given before, at, or after the meeting, and whether given in a record, orally, or by attendance. Attendance by a member at a meeting for election of governors is a waiver of notice of that meeting, except where the member objects at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and does not participate in the meeting after the objection.

Once elected, a governor holds office for the term for which the governor was elected and until a successor is elected, or until the earlier death, resignation, disqualification, or removal of the governor. A governor may resign at any time. A governor may be removed at any time, without cause and without advance notice, by a majority of the voting power of all of the members. The existence of vacancies does not affect the power of the board to function if at least one governor remains in office.

When a vacancy occurs, the limited liability company shall immediately notify all members in a record of the vacancy, stating the cause of the vacancy and the date the notice is sent. Within thirty days of that date, the members may fill the vacancy in the same method the members may elect governors under subdivision c. If the vacancy is not filled by the members under this subdivision, then the vacancy may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining governors, even though less than a quorum.

The board shall meet from time to time as determined by members holding a majority of the voting power of the members, at a place decided by the board. If the day or date, time, and place of a board of governors meeting have been provided in a board resolution, or announced at a previous meeting of the board of governors, then no notice is required. Notice of an adjourned meeting need not be given other than by announcement at the meeting at which adjournment is taken. If notice is required for a meeting, then notice shall be made in the manner stated in subdivision h.

A governor may call a board meeting by giving at least ten days’ notice in a record to all governors of the date, time, and place of the meeting. The notice need not state the purpose of the meeting. As to each governor, the notice is effective when given.

“Notice” shall be determined as provided in subsection 35 of section 10-32.1-02.

A governor may waive notice of a meeting of the board of governors. A waiver of notice by a governor entitled to notice is effective whether given before, at, or after the meeting, and whether given in a record, orally, or by attendance. Attendance by a governor at a meeting is a waiver of notice of that meeting, except where the governor objects at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened and does not participate in the meeting after the objection.

A majority of the governors currently holding office is a quorum for the transaction of business. When a quorum is present at a duly called or held meeting of the board, the vote of a majority of the directors present constitutes an act of the board. If a quorum is present when a duly called or held meeting is convened, then the governors present may continue to transact business until adjournment, even though the withdrawal of a number of governors originally present leaves less than the proportion or number otherwise required for a quorum.

Any meeting among governors may be conducted solely by one or more means of remote communication through which all of the governors may participate with each other during the meeting, if the number of governors participating in the meeting would be sufficient to constitute a quorum. Participation in a meeting through remote communication constitutes presence in person at the meeting.

A governor may participate in a board of governors meeting by means of remote communication, through which the governor, other governors so participating, and all governors physically present at the meeting may participate with each other during the meeting. Participation in a meeting through remote communication constitutes presence in person at the meeting.

An action required or permitted to be taken at a board meeting may be taken by written action signed by the number of governors that would be required to take the same action at a meeting of the board of governors at which all governors were present. The written action is effective when signed by the required number of governors, unless a different effective time is provided in the written action. When written action is permitted to be taken by less than all governors, then all governors must be notified immediately of its text and effective date. Failure to provide the notice does not invalidate the written action. A governor who does not sign or consent to the written action has no liability for the action or actions taken by the written action.

If the board designates a person as “chief manager”, “president”, “chief executive officer”, or another title of similar import, then that person shall:

Serve as an agent of the limited liability company at the will of the board, without prejudice to any rights the person may have under a contract with the limited liability company;

Have general active management of the business of the limited liability company, subject to the supervision and control of the board;

See that all orders and resolutions of the board of governors are carried into effect;

Sign and deliver in the name of the limited liability company any deeds, mortgages, bonds, contracts, or other instruments pertaining to the business of the limited liability company, except in cases in which the authority to sign and deliver is required by law to be exercised by another person or is expressly delegated by the board of governors to some other officer or agent of the limited liability company;

Maintain records of and, whenever necessary, certify all proceedings of the board of governors and the members; and

Perform other duties prescribed by the board of governors.

If the board designates a person as “treasurer”, “chief financial officer”, or another title of similar import, then that person shall:

Serve as an agent of the limited liability company at the will of the board, without prejudice to any rights the person may have under a contract with the limited liability company;

Keep accurate financial records for the limited liability company;

Deposit all money, drafts, and checks in the name of and to the credit of the limited liability company in the banks and depositories designated by the board of governors;

Endorse for deposit all notes, checks, and drafts received by the limited liability company as ordered by the board of governors, making proper vouchers for them;

Disburse limited liability company funds and issue checks and drafts in the name of the limited liability company, as ordered by the board of governors;

Give to the chief executive officer and the board of governors, whenever requested, an account of all transactions by the chief financial officer and of the financial condition of the limited liability company; and

Perform other duties prescribed by the board of governors or by the chief executive officer.

The consent of all members is required to:

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the property of the company, with or without the good will, outside the ordinary course of the activities of the company, except member consent is not required for the grant of a lien on or security interest in all or substantially all of the company’s property and assets, whether in the usual and regular course of the company’s business, or for the transfer of any or all of the company’s property to an organization, all of the ownership interests that are directly or indirectly owned through wholly owned organizations, by the company;

Approve a merger, conversion, or domestication under sections 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-71; and

Amend the operating agreement.

Subject to subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-05, for purposes of this subsection, each member possesses voting power in proportion to the interest of the member in distributions of the limited liability company before dissolution and a majority of the voting power of the members is a quorum at a meeting of the members.

Any member may demand a meeting of the members to take action requiring consent of members under this chapter upon not less than twenty days’ notice to each member in a record of the date and time of the meeting. Any meeting held upon member notice shall be held at the principal executive office of the limited liability company if located within this state, and at the registered office if the principal executive office is not located within the state. Any action requiring the consent of members under this chapter may be taken or approved without a meeting by the written consent of the members holding the voting power required to take such action at a duly called meeting at which all members were present. A member may appoint a proxy or other agent to consent or otherwise act for the member by signing an appointing record, personally or by the agent of the member.

The dissolution of a limited liability company does not affect the applicability of this section. However, a person that wrongfully causes dissolution of the company loses the right to participate in management in any capacity.

This chapter does not entitle a member to remuneration for services performed for a member-managed limited liability company, except for reasonable compensation for services rendered in winding up the activities of the company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 82, § 4, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 83, §§ 1,
2, 3, effective August 1, 2017.

10-32.1-40.
Indemnification and insurance.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Limited liability company” includes a domestic or foreign limited liability company that was the predecessor of the limited liability company referred to in this section in a merger or other transaction in which the existence of the predecessor ceased upon consummation of the transaction.

“Official capacity” means:

With respect to a member of a member-managed company, a manager of a manager-managed company, or a governor of a board-managed company, actions taken in that capacity;

With respect to a person other than a member of a member-managed company, a manager of a manager-managed company, or a governor of a board-managed company:

The elective or appointive office or position held by a manager or officer, member of a committee of the board of governors;

The employment relationship undertaken by an employee of the limited liability company; or

The scope of the services provided by members of the limited liability company who provide services to the limited liability company; and

With respect to a governor, manager, member, or employee of the limited liability company who, while a member, governor, manager, or employee of the limited liability company, is or was serving at the request of the limited liability company or whose duties in that position involve or involved service as a governor, director, manager, officer, member, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another organization or employee benefit plan, the position of that person as a governor, director, manager, officer, member, partner, trustee, employee, or agent, as the case may be, of the other organization or employee benefit plan.

“Proceeding” means a threatened, pending, or completed civil, criminal, administrative, arbitration, or investigative proceeding, including a proceeding by or in the right of the limited liability company.

“Special legal counsel” means counsel who has not in the preceding five years:

Represented the limited liability company or a related organization in a capacity other than special legal counsel; or

Represented a member, governor, manager, member of a committee of the board of governors, or employee, or other person whose indemnification is in issue.

With respect to indemnification:

Subject to the provisions of subsection 4, a limited liability company shall indemnify a person made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding by reason of the former or present official capacity of the person against judgments, penalties, fines, including, without limitation, excise taxes assessed against the person with respect to an employee benefit plan, settlements, and reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding, if, with respect to the acts or omissions of the person complained of in the proceeding, the person:

Has not been indemnified by another organization or employee benefit plan for the same judgments, penalties, fines, including, without limitation, excise taxes assessed against the person with respect to an employee benefit plan, settlements, and reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by the person in connection with the proceeding with respect to the same acts or omissions;

Acted in good faith;

Received no improper personal benefit and complied with the duties stated in sections 10-32.1-31 and 10-32.1-41, if applicable;

In the case of a criminal proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe the conduct was unlawful; and

In the case of acts or omissions occurring in the official capacity described in paragraph 1 or 2 of subdivision b of subsection 1, reasonably believed that the conduct was in the best interests of the limited liability company, or in the case of acts or omissions occurring in the official capacity described in paragraph 3 of subdivision b of subsection 1, reasonably believed that the conduct was not opposed to the best interests of the limited liability company. If the acts or omissions of the person complained of in the proceeding relate to conduct as a director, officer, trustee, employee, or agent of an employee benefit plan, then the conduct is not considered to be opposed to the best interests of the limited liability company if the person reasonably believed that the conduct was in the best interests of the participants or beneficiaries of the employee benefit plan.

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent does not, of itself, establish that the person did not meet the criteria set forth in this subsection.

Subject to the provisions of subsection 4, if a person is made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding, then the person is entitled, upon written request to the limited liability company, to payment or reimbursement by the limited liability company of reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees and disbursements, incurred by the person in advance of the final disposition of the proceeding:

Upon receipt by the limited liability company of a written affirmation by the person of a good faith belief that the criteria for indemnification in subsection 2 have been satisfied and a written undertaking by the person to repay all amounts so paid or reimbursed by the limited liability company, if it is ultimately determined that the criteria for indemnification have not been satisfied;

After a determination that the facts then known to those making the determination would not preclude indemnification under this section; and

The written undertaking required by subdivision a is an unlimited general obligation of the person making it, but need not be secured and shall be accepted without reference to financial ability to make the repayment.

The articles of organization or the operating agreement either may prohibit indemnification or advances of expenses otherwise required by this section or may impose conditions on indemnification or advances of expenses in addition to the conditions contained in subsections 2 and 3, including, without limitation, monetary limits on indemnification or advances of expenses, if the conditions apply equally to all persons or to all persons within a given class. A prohibition or limit on indemnification or advances may not apply to or affect the right of a person to indemnification or advances of expenses with respect to any acts or omissions of the person occurring before the effective date of a provision in the articles of organization, a member control agreement, or the date of adoption of a provision in the bylaws establishing the prohibition or limit on indemnification or advances.

This section does not require, or limit the ability of, a limited liability company to reimburse expenses, including attorney fees and disbursements, incurred by a person in connection with an appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the person has not been made or threatened to be made a party to a proceeding.

With respect to the determination of eligibility:

All determinations whether indemnification of a person is required because the criteria in subsection 2 have been satisfied and whether a person is entitled to payment or reimbursement of expenses in advance of the final disposition of a proceeding as provided in subsection 3 must be made:

In a board-managed limited liability company:

By the board of governors by a majority of a quorum, provided that governors who are, at the time, parties to the proceeding shall not be counted for determining either a majority or the presence of a quorum;

If a quorum under subparagraph a cannot be obtained, then by a majority of a committee of the board of governors, consisting solely of two or more governors not at the time parties to the proceeding, duly designated to act in the matter by a majority of the full board of governors including governors who are parties; and

If a determination is not made under subparagraph a or b, then by special legal counsel, selected either by a majority of the board of governors or a committee by vote pursuant to subparagraph a or b or, if the requisite quorum of the full board of governors cannot be obtained and the committee cannot be established, then by a majority of the full board of governors including governors who are parties.

In all other cases, then by the affirmative vote of the members, subject to subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-05 with each member having voting power in proportion to the interest of the member in distributions of the limited liability company before dissolution, but the membership interests held by parties to the proceeding must not be counted in determining the presence of a quorum and are not considered to be present and entitled to vote on the determination; or

If an adverse determination is made under subparagraphs a or b, or if no determination is made under subparagraphs a or b then within sixty days after:

The later to occur of the termination of a proceeding or a written request for indemnification to the limited liability company; or

A written request for an advance of expenses, as the case may be, by a court in this state, which may be the same court in which the proceeding involving the liability of the person took place, upon application of the person and any notice which the court requires. The person seeking indemnification or payment or reimbursement of expenses pursuant to this subdivision has the burden of establishing that the person is entitled to indemnification or payment or reimbursement of expenses.

With respect to a person who is not, and was not at the time of the acts or omissions complained of in the proceedings, a member, governor, manager, or person possessing, directly or indirectly, the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of the limited liability company, the determination whether indemnification of this person is required because the criteria set forth in subsection 2 have been satisfied and whether this person is entitled to payment or reimbursement of expenses in advance of the final disposition of a proceeding as provided in subsection 3 may be made:

In a board-managed limited liability company, by an annually appointed committee of the board of governors, having at least one member who is a governor, which committee shall report at least annually to the board of governors concerning its actions; and

In all other cases by a committee appointed annually by the members, having at least one committee member who is a member of the limited liability company, which committee shall report at least annually to the board of governors concerning its actions.

A limited liability company may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of a member, manager, or governor of the company against liability asserted against or incurred by the member, manager, or governor in that capacity or arising from that status even if, under subsection 7 of section 10-32.1-13, the operating agreement could not eliminate or limit the liability of a person to the company for the conduct giving rise to the liability and whether or not the limited liability company would have been required to indemnify the person against the liability under this section.

A limited liability company that indemnifies or advances expenses to a person according to this section in connection with a proceeding by or on behalf of the limited liability company shall report to the members in writing the amount of the indemnification or advance and to whom and on whose behalf it was paid not later than the next meeting of members.

Nothing in this section must be construed to limit the power of the limited liability company to indemnify persons other than a governor, manager, member, employee, or member of a committee of the board of the limited liability company, by contract or otherwise.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.